Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
CHAPTER 3 Attachment Proceedings

Cross references.

Executions and judicial sales, T. 9, C. 13.

Attachment of goods covered by negotiable document of title, §

11-7-602

.

Issuance of writ of ne exeat to restrain person from leaving jurisdiction of state, §

23-3-20

et seq.

Jeopardy assessments by state revenue commissioner in situations where taxpayer gives evidence of intention to leave state, to remove property from state, or other actions to avoid collection of state tax, §

48-2-51

.

Attachment of property by state revenue commissioner, §

48-2-55

.

Law reviews.

For note discussing implications for other postjudgment collection devices of developments in postjudgment garnishment law in Georgia, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 60 (1977).

For article critically analyzing the various elements constitutionally required for prejudgment seizure of a debtor’s property, focusing on § 9-503 of the U.C.C., see 28 Mercer L. Rev. 665 (1977).

For note discussing constitutional issues affecting attachment procedures, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).